dictionaries/tr_TR/tr_TR.aff
FLAG num
SFX 47452 N 1
SFX 47452 0 kalarımdan .

SFX 47453 N 1
SFX 47453 0 ülükleriyle .

SFX 47454 N 1
SFX 47454 0 daysak .

SFX 47455 N 1
SFX 47455 0 rdeydim .

SFX 47456 N 1
SFX 47456 0 yamazsan .

SFX 47457 N 1
SFX 47457 0 cuğundan .

SFX 47458 N 1
SFX 47458 0 andım .

SFX 47459 N 1
SFX 47459 0 aneyi .

SFX 47460 N 1
SFX 47460 0 bencilik .

SFX 47461 N 1
SFX 47461 0 üklerimizden .

SFX 47462 N 1
SFX 47462 0 rle .

SFX 47463 N 1
SFX 47463 0 stü .

SFX 47464 N 1
SFX 47464 0 şırsa .

SFX 47465 N 1
SFX 47465 0 tmende .

SFX 47466 N 1
SFX 47466 0 eşleri .

SFX 47467 N 1
SFX 47467 0 letmiştir .

SFX 47468 N 1
SFX 47468 0 verlerden .

SFX 47469 N 1
SFX 47469 0 ımlarımızı .

SFX 47470 N 1
SFX 47470 0 enlerdenim .

SFX 47471 N 1
SFX 47471 0 izmli .

SFX 47472 N 1
SFX 47472 0 ştırmakla .

SFX 47473 N 1
SFX 47473 0 tılacaktır .

SFX 47474 N 1
SFX 47474 0 up .

SFX 47475 N 1
SFX 47475 0 acığa .

SFX 47476 N 1
SFX 47476 0 icilikle .

SFX 47477 N 1
SFX 47477 0 şlardaki .

SFX 47478 N 1
SFX 47478 0 selase .

SFX 47479 N 1
SFX 47479 0 ştirilmişlerin .

SFX 47480 N 1
SFX 47480 0 kon .

SFX 47481 N 1
SFX 47481 0 eşecekler .

SFX 47482 N 1
SFX 47482 0 eğiniz .

SFX 47483 N 1
SFX 47483 0 sızca .

SFX 47484 N 1
SFX 47484 0 otundaki .

SFX 47485 N 1
SFX 47485 0 rmanız .

SFX 47486 N 1
SFX 47486 0 amıyorlardı .

SFX 47487 N 1
SFX 47487 0 emeyince .

SFX 47488 N 1
SFX 47488 0 msün .

SFX 47489 N 1
SFX 47489 0 tüğünden .

SFX 47490 N 1
SFX 47490 0 izleşme .

SFX 47491 N 1
SFX 47491 0 bimle .

SFX 47492 N 1
SFX 47492 0 erininkinden .

SFX 47493 N 1
SFX 47493 0 rdekilerin .

SFX 47494 N 1
SFX 47494 0 lamayanlar .

SFX 47495 N 1
SFX 47495 0 biliyorlarsa .

SFX 47496 N 1
SFX 47496 0 iğimmiş .

SFX 47497 N 1
SFX 47497 0 ştirmede .

SFX 47498 N 1
SFX 47498 0 etlim .

SFX 47499 N 1
SFX 47499 0 irici .

SFX 47500 N 1
SFX 47500 0 dalarında .

SFX 47501 N 1
SFX 47501 0 etiyoruz .

SFX 47502 N 1
SFX 47502 0 demeyiz .

SFX 47503 N 1
SFX 47503 0 zıma .

SFX 47504 N 1
SFX 47504 0 mezliğin .

SFX 47505 N 1
SFX 47505 0 lettiren .

SFX 47506 N 1
SFX 47506 0 laşsam .

SFX 47507 N 1
SFX 47507 0 rlıktır .

SFX 47508 N 1
SFX 47508 0 leştirse .

SFX 47509 N 1
SFX 47509 0 adıklarımı .

SFX 47510 N 1
SFX 47510 0 lerde .

SFX 47511 N 1
SFX 47511 0 eliğine .

SFX 47512 N 1
SFX 47512 0 iyecinin .

SFX 47513 N 1
SFX 47513 0 çusuyum .

SFX 47514 N 1
SFX 47514 0 llerinin .

SFX 47515 N 1
SFX 47515 0 abilirlikleri .

SFX 47516 N 1
SFX 47516 0 syonlan .

SFX 47517 N 1
SFX 47517 0 azeli .

SFX 47518 N 1
SFX 47518 0 lığımın .

SFX 47519 N 1
SFX 47519 0 tüleriyle .

SFX 47520 N 1
SFX 47520 0 atlamak .

SFX 47521 N 1
SFX 47521 0 esinini .

SFX 47522 N 1
SFX 47522 0 nlerdendim .

SFX 47523 N 1
SFX 47523 0 lukluk .

SFX 47524 N 1
SFX 47524 0 idesin .

SFX 47525 N 1
SFX 47525 0 ştirmenizde .

SFX 47526 N 1
SFX 47526 0 mlenerek .

SFX 47527 N 1
SFX 47527 0 ştirmişse .

SFX 47528 N 1
SFX 47528 0 düysem .

SFX 47529 N 1
SFX 47529 0 aniliği .

SFX 47530 N 1
SFX 47530 0 rmelidirler .

SFX 47531 N 1
SFX 47531 0 lenik .

SFX 47532 N 1
SFX 47532 0 üğümüze .

SFX 47533 N 1
SFX 47533 0 sında .

SFX 47534 N 1
SFX 47534 0 raltan .

SFX 47535 N 1
SFX 47535 0 ndekilerden .

SFX 47536 N 1
SFX 47536 0 anlıların .

SFX 47537 N 1
SFX 47537 0 müşsen .

SFX 47538 N 1
SFX 47538 0 yıveren .

SFX 47539 N 1
SFX 47539 0 aklığından .

SFX 47540 N 1
SFX 47540 0 rilseydi .

SFX 47541 N 1
SFX 47541 0 kırlı .

SFX 47542 N 1
SFX 47542 0 tacağız .

SFX 47543 N 1
SFX 47543 0 lın .

SFX 47544 N 1
SFX 47544 0 stlerde .

SFX 47545 N 1
SFX 47545 0 andırıyorsunuz .

SFX 47546 N 1
SFX 47546 0 tırmalara .

SFX 47547 N 1
SFX 47547 0 diliği .

SFX 47548 N 1
SFX 47548 0 rmalıdırlar .

SFX 47549 N 1
SFX 47549 0 muyormuş .

SFX 47550 N 1
SFX 47550 0 staydı .

SFX 47551 N 1
SFX 47551 0 tlarımızla .

SFX 47552 N 1
SFX 47552 0 vermişiz .

SFX 47553 N 1
SFX 47553 0 pala .

SFX 47554 N 1
SFX 47554 0 rmektedir .

SFX 47555 N 1
SFX 47555 0 ştıracaklarını .

SFX 47556 N 1
SFX 47556 0 lebiliyordu .

SFX 47557 N 1
SFX 47557 0 nmesiz .

SFX 47558 N 1
SFX 47558 0 lamamın .

SFX 47559 N 1
SFX 47559 0 rılmamız .

SFX 47560 N 1
SFX 47560 0 zleş .

SFX 47561 N 1
SFX 47561 0 meli .

SFX 47562 N 1
SFX 47562 0 lisisin .

SFX 47563 N 1
SFX 47563 0 vasıta .

SFX 47564 N 1
SFX 47564 0 leceğiydi .

SFX 47565 N 1
SFX 47565 0 mizdesin .

SFX 47566 N 1
SFX 47566 0 emeyişini .

SFX 47567 N 1
SFX 47567 0 zlak .

SFX 47568 N 1
SFX 47568 0 darlığını .

SFX 47569 N 1
SFX 47569 0 rebilseniz .

SFX 47570 N 1
SFX 47570 0 tırıyor .

SFX 47571 N 1
SFX 47571 0 ttirilmelidir .

SFX 47572 N 1
SFX 47572 0 koptan .

SFX 47573 N 1
SFX 47573 0 izmiyle .

SFX 47574 N 1
SFX 47574 0 leyeceğim .

SFX 47575 N 1
SFX 47575 0 kamı .

SFX 47576 N 1
SFX 47576 0 acağınızda .

SFX 47577 N 1
SFX 47577 0 uluyla .

SFX 47578 N 1
SFX 47578 0 nabilinen .

SFX 47579 N 1
SFX 47579 0 elleştirdi .

SFX 47580 N 1
SFX 47580 0 ezinin .

SFX 47581 N 1
SFX 47581 0 olojilerin .

SFX 47582 N 1
SFX 47582 0 dirsem .

SFX 47583 N 1
SFX 47583 0 ınınkilere .

SFX 47584 N 1
SFX 47584 0 aklarımda .

SFX 47585 N 1
SFX 47585 0 laş .

SFX 47586 N 1
SFX 47586 0 uğumu .

SFX 47587 N 1
SFX 47587 0 imizdeyiz .

SFX 47588 N 1
SFX 47588 0 ardaymış .

SFX 47589 N 1
SFX 47589 0 iciğim .

SFX 47590 N 1
SFX 47590 0 labilmesine .

SFX 47591 N 1
SFX 47591 0 post .

SFX 47592 N 1
SFX 47592 0 vara .

SFX 47593 N 1
SFX 47593 0 ıyormuşum .

SFX 47594 N 1
SFX 47594 0 laştırdığını .

SFX 47595 N 1
SFX 47595 0 nirsin .

SFX 47596 N 1
SFX 47596 0 cekten .

SFX 47597 N 1
SFX 47597 0 tiriyorum .

SFX 47598 N 1
SFX 47598 0 ğımızdandır .

SFX 47599 N 1
SFX 47599 0 nüzünde .

SFX 47600 N 1
SFX 47600 0 atınla .

SFX 47601 N 1
SFX 47601 0 yebilmenizi .

SFX 47602 N 1
SFX 47602 0 masıymış .

SFX 47603 N 1
SFX 47603 0 slarımızı .

SFX 47604 N 1
SFX 47604 0 lendiriyoruz .

SFX 47605 N 1
SFX 47605 0 saba .

SFX 47606 N 1
SFX 47606 0 kleştirilmesi .

SFX 47607 N 1
SFX 47607 0 ininkine .

SFX 47608 N 1
SFX 47608 0 ştiremedim .

SFX 47609 N 1
SFX 47609 0 şamama .

SFX 47610 N 1
SFX 47610 0 ajıyla .

SFX 47611 N 1
SFX 47611 0 amayacağınızı .

SFX 47612 N 1
SFX 47612 0 liğinizin .

SFX 47613 N 1
SFX 47613 0 amlarla .

SFX 47614 N 1
SFX 47614 0 yacaklarım .

SFX 47615 N 1
SFX 47615 0 ürmüş .

SFX 47616 N 1
SFX 47616 0 lanabilecek .

SFX 47617 N 1
SFX 47617 0 nmişlerle .

SFX 47618 N 1
SFX 47618 0 nluğundan .

SFX 47619 N 1
SFX 47619 0 anıyken .

SFX 47620 N 1
SFX 47620 0 ivermişti .

SFX 47621 N 1
SFX 47621 0 ürlerse .

SFX 47622 N 1
SFX 47622 0 haları .

SFX 47623 N 1
SFX 47623 0 şmadığının .

SFX 47624 N 1
SFX 47624 0 letiriz .

SFX 47625 N 1
SFX 47625 0 ılmadığında .

SFX 47626 N 1
SFX 47626 0 lüklerin .

SFX 47627 N 1
SFX 47627 0 nmekte .

SFX 47628 N 1
SFX 47628 0 lciliğe .

SFX 47629 N 1
SFX 47629 0 hanede .

SFX 47630 N 1
SFX 47630 0 şındadır .

SFX 47631 N 1
SFX 47631 0 çilerimizden .

SFX 47632 N 1
SFX 47632 0 lığıdır .

SFX 47633 N 1
SFX 47633 0 etmiştik .

SFX 47634 N 1
SFX 47634 0 leysek .

SFX 47635 N 1
SFX 47635 0 mediğiydi .

SFX 47636 N 1
SFX 47636 0 ştırmış .

SFX 47637 N 1
SFX 47637 0 ağrının .

SFX 47638 N 1
SFX 47638 0 lendirsinler .

SFX 47639 N 1
SFX 47639 0 slarına .

SFX 47640 N 1
SFX 47640 0 geçten .

SFX 47641 N 1
SFX 47641 0 klüde .

SFX 47642 N 1
SFX 47642 0 mdeydi .

SFX 47643 N 1
SFX 47643 0 adır .

SFX 47644 N 1
SFX 47644 0 gelmişlerdi .

SFX 47645 N 1
SFX 47645 0 tırılırsın .

SFX 47646 N 1
SFX 47646 0 ktu .

SFX 47647 N 1
SFX 47647 0 bildiğinizdir .

SFX 47648 N 1
SFX 47648 0 yanıydı .

SFX 47649 N 1
SFX 47649 0 dirmeden .

SFX 47650 N 1
SFX 47650 0 rdakilerden .

SFX 47651 N 1
SFX 47651 0 etredeki .

SFX 47652 N 1
SFX 47652 0 lleri .

SFX 47653 N 1
SFX 47653 0 enebilmeli .

SFX 47654 N 1
SFX 47654 0 asa .

SFX 47655 N 1
SFX 47655 0 lmadık .

SFX 47656 N 1
SFX 47656 0 ramadığımız .

SFX 47657 N 1
SFX 47657 0 nınken .

SFX 47658 N 1
SFX 47658 0 nlıktan .

SFX 47659 N 1
SFX 47659 0 neceklerden .

SFX 47660 N 1
SFX 47660 0 culuğumu .

SFX 47661 N 1
SFX 47661 0 amadığı .

SFX 47662 N 1
SFX 47662 0 nemiyoruz .

SFX 47663 N 1
SFX 47663 0 mememle .

SFX 47664 N 1
SFX 47664 0 olojisi .

SFX 47665 N 1
SFX 47665 0 klarımında .

SFX 47666 N 1
SFX 47666 0 zlüklerinin .

SFX 47667 N 1
SFX 47667 0 veriyorsunuz .

SFX 47668 N 1
SFX 47668 0 graflarda .

SFX 47669 N 1
SFX 47669 0 eriyleydi .

SFX 47670 N 1
SFX 47670 0 tilemez .

SFX 47671 N 1
SFX 47671 0 amamaktır .

SFX 47672 N 1
SFX 47672 0 ramadan .

SFX 47673 N 1
SFX 47673 0 tekiler .

SFX 47674 N 1
SFX 47674 0 gayla .

SFX 47675 N 1
SFX 47675 0 unt .

SFX 47676 N 1
SFX 47676 0 ttıracak .

SFX 47677 N 1
SFX 47677 0 enlerini .

SFX 47678 N 1
SFX 47678 0 endirdiğini .

SFX 47679 N 1
SFX 47679 0 şmalarım .

SFX 47680 N 1
SFX 47680 0 verilmesi .

SFX 47681 N 1
SFX 47681 0 ılacağım .

SFX 47682 N 1
SFX 47682 0 amaktadırlar .

SFX 47683 N 1
SFX 47683 0 ındakini .

SFX 47684 N 1
SFX 47684 0 meyeler .

SFX 47685 N 1
SFX 47685 0 larmışta .

SFX 47686 N 1
SFX 47686 0 mire .

SFX 47687 N 1
SFX 47687 0 iliğimizdir .

SFX 47688 N 1
SFX 47688 0 lımı .

SFX 47689 N 1
SFX 47689 0 ngler .

SFX 47690 N 1
SFX 47690 0 şsün .

SFX 47691 N 1
SFX 47691 0 aliyle .

SFX 47692 N 1
SFX 47692 0 site .

SFX 47693 N 1
SFX 47693 0 tayca .

SFX 47694 N 1
SFX 47694 0 öründeki .

SFX 47695 N 1
SFX 47695 0 efi .

SFX 47696 N 1
SFX 47696 0 diktir .

SFX 47697 N 1
SFX 47697 0 ralar .

SFX 47698 N 1
SFX 47698 0 andırır .

SFX 47699 N 1
SFX 47699 0 ylar .

SFX 47700 N 1
SFX 47700 0 jimi .

SFX 47701 N 1
SFX 47701 0 aştırırsan .

SFX 47702 N 1
SFX 47702 0 ülin .

SFX 47703 N 1
SFX 47703 0 itliği .

SFX 47704 N 1
SFX 47704 0 ıları .

SFX 47705 N 1
SFX 47705 0 tezde .

SFX 47706 N 1
SFX 47706 0 üşlerimiz .

SFX 47707 N 1
SFX 47707 0 iksiz .

SFX 47708 N 1
SFX 47708 0 anmamışsa .

SFX 47709 N 1
SFX 47709 0 iyorlarken .

SFX 47710 N 1
SFX 47710 0 nlerimizin .

SFX 47711 N 1
SFX 47711 0 ndiğinizi .

SFX 47712 N 1
SFX 47712 0 gillerdir .

SFX 47713 N 1
SFX 47713 0 tmalıyız .

SFX 47714 N 1
SFX 47714 0 gelmiş .

SFX 47715 N 1
SFX 47715 0 adiler .

SFX 47716 N 1
SFX 47716 0 oyun .

SFX 47717 N 1
SFX 47717 0 macılığının .

SFX 47718 N 1
SFX 47718 0 alidir .

SFX 47719 N 1
SFX 47719 0 iyumu .

SFX 47720 N 1
SFX 47720 0 ızlarım .

SFX 47721 N 1
SFX 47721 0 tirebilmelidir .

SFX 47722 N 1
SFX 47722 0 eceğinin .

SFX 47723 N 1
SFX 47723 0 dırmaların .

SFX 47724 N 1
SFX 47724 0 stimiz .

SFX 47725 N 1
SFX 47725 0 iveriyorsun .

SFX 47726 N 1
SFX 47726 0 rıcıya .

SFX 47727 N 1
SFX 47727 0 ologdur .

SFX 47728 N 1
SFX 47728 0 memişken .

SFX 47729 N 1
SFX 47729 0 dırılabilirler .

SFX 47730 N 1
SFX 47730 0 dırmamak .

SFX 47731 N 1
SFX 47731 0 nişte .

SFX 47732 N 1
SFX 47732 0 nağımı .

SFX 47733 N 1
SFX 47733 0 lattan .

SFX 47734 N 1
SFX 47734 0 leşiyorsunuz .

SFX 47735 N 1
SFX 47735 0 ozlarını .

SFX 47736 N 1
SFX 47736 0 mez .

SFX 47737 N 1
SFX 47737 0 isiyseniz .

SFX 47738 N 1
SFX 47738 0 vince .

SFX 47739 N 1
SFX 47739 0 işlerdeki .

SFX 47740 N 1
SFX 47740 0 ıların .

SFX 47741 N 1
SFX 47741 0 üşlerse .

SFX 47742 N 1
SFX 47742 0 şmalara .

SFX 47743 N 1
SFX 47743 0 tusu .

SFX 47744 N 1
SFX 47744 0 llama .

SFX 47745 N 1
SFX 47745 0 ajlarla .

SFX 47746 N 1
SFX 47746 0 eyense .

SFX 47747 N 1
SFX 47747 0 çınızın .

SFX 47748 N 1
SFX 47748 0 hların .

SFX 47749 N 1
SFX 47749 0 rmediğinizi .

SFX 47750 N 1
SFX 47750 0 klıdan .

SFX 47751 N 1
SFX 47751 0 ülerimizin .

SFX 47752 N 1
SFX 47752 0 zıyı .

SFX 47753 N 1
SFX 47753 0 mezliğe .

SFX 47754 N 1
SFX 47754 0 şabileceğini .

SFX 47755 N 1
SFX 47755 0 aştırması .

SFX 47756 N 1
SFX 47756 0 ğumuzdandır .

SFX 47757 N 1
SFX 47757 0 endirerek .

SFX 47758 N 1
SFX 47758 0 densiniz .

SFX 47759 N 1
SFX 47759 0 namelerde .

SFX 47760 N 1
SFX 47760 0 rüyüz .

SFX 47761 N 1
SFX 47761 0 ilebileceğine .

SFX 47762 N 1
SFX 47762 0 ninkinden .

SFX 47763 N 1
SFX 47763 0 anmama .

SFX 47764 N 1
SFX 47764 0 amasan .

SFX 47765 N 1
SFX 47765 0 lendiriyorsunuz .

SFX 47766 N 1
SFX 47766 0 ilebilme .

SFX 47767 N 1
SFX 47767 0 endirmesine .

SFX 47768 N 1
SFX 47768 0 atıcıdır .

SFX 47769 N 1
SFX 47769 0 laştırıyoruz .
